Alaska statutes. Title 2. Aeronautics.
Article 4. Airport Assistance.

Collateral references. —

8A Am. Jur. 2d, Aviation, §§ 92-94.

Sec. 02.15.120.
Assistance to construct, enlarge, or improve air navigation facilities.

The department may match available funds with those of municipalities, federal agencies, or other state agencies, for project costs relating to the construction, enlargement, or improvement of airports.
The department may assist persons in the construction, enlargement, and improvement of airports and air navigation facilities. The airports and facilities, until they are abandoned as such, shall be at all times available for the use of and accessible to the general public, and maintained as public airports and facilities.

History.

(§ 5 A ch 123 SLA 1949; am § 2 ch 68 SLA 1955; am § 17 ch 168 SLA 1978)

Sec. 02.15.130.
Assistance to the federal government, municipalities, and other persons.

The department may make available its engineering, maintenance, and other services, with or without charge, to the federal government, or to a municipality or person in connection with the planning, acquisition, construction, improvement, maintenance, or operation of airports or air navigation facilities.

History.

(§ 9 A ch 123 SLA 1949; am § 2 ch 138 SLA 1986; am § 1 ch 90 SLA 1991)

Sec. 02.15.140.
State financial assistance.

The department may grant or lend money, subject to the provisions of AS

02.15.060

,

02.15.070

, and

02.15.120

, to any person or municipality or to municipalities acting jointly for project costs relating to the planning, acquisition, construction, improvement, maintenance, or operation of an airport owned or controlled or to be owned or controlled by the municipality or municipalities or person.
Grants or loans may be furnished in connection with federal or other financial aid for the same purpose.

History.

(§ 9 B ch 123 SLA 1949; am § 18 ch 168 SLA 1978; am § 1 ch 59 SLA 1982)

Sec. 02.15.150.
Federal aid.

A municipality may not participate under the Federal Airport Act unless the department has approved its application. The department may approve, disapprove, or modify a municipal application for direct participation under the Federal Airport Act.

History.

(§ 9 C ch 123 SLA 1949)

Revisor’s notes. —

The Federal Airport Act has been repealed and superseded.

Sec. 02.15.155.
Project costs defined.

In AS

02.15.120

—

02.15.155

, “project costs” includes, in addition to costs directly related to the project, the sum total of all costs of financing and carrying out the project including, but not limited to, the costs of all necessary studies, surveys, plans and specifications, architectural, engineering, or other special services, acquisition of real property, site preparation and development, purchase, construction, reconstruction and improvement of real property and the acquisition of machinery and equipment as may be necessary in connection with the project; an allocable portion of the administrative and operating expenses of the grantee; the cost of financing the project, including interest on bonds issued to finance the project; and the cost of other items, including any indemnity and surety bonds and premiums on insurance, legal fees, fees and expenses of trustees, depositaries, financial advisors, and paying agents for the bonds issued as the issuer considers necessary.

History.

(§ 19 ch 168 SLA 1978)